en: Color family: Black; Blue; Blue-black; Brown; Gold; Green; Purple; Red; Sepia; Silver; White; Other
pt-BR: Família de cores: Preto; Azul; Preto azulado; Marrom; Dourado; Verde; Roxo; Vermelho; Sépia; Prata; Branco; Outro
vi: Nhóm màu sắc: Đen; Xanh dương; Xanh đen; Nâu; Vàng; Xanh lá cây; Tím; Đỏ; Nâu sepia; Bạc; Trắng; Khác
ko: 색상 계열: 검정색; 파란색; 블루블랙; 갈색; 금색; 녹색; 보라색; 빨간색; 세피아; 은색; 흰색; 기타
lt-LT: Spalvų grupė: Juoda; Mėlyna; Mėlynai juoda; Ruda; Auksinė; Žalia; Violetinė; Raudona; Sepijos; Sidabrinė; Balta; Kita
pt-PT: Família de cor: Preto; Azul; Preto-azulado; Castanho; Dourado; Verde; Roxo; Vermelho; Sépia; Prata; Branco; Outro
el: Οικογένεια χρώματος: Μαύρο; Μπλε; Μπλε-μαύρο; Καφέ; Χρυσό; Πράσινο; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Σέπια; Ασημί; Λευκό; Άλλο
fr: Famille de couleurs: Noir; Bleu; Bleu-noir; Marron; Or; Vert; Violet; Rouge; Sépia; Argent; Blanc; Autre
tr: Renk ailesi: Siyah; Mavi; Mavi-siyah; Kahverengi; Altın; Yeşil; Mor; Kırmızı; Sepya; Gümüş; Beyaz; Diğer
ru: Цветовая гамма: Черный; Синий; Иссиня-черный; Коричневый; Золотой; Зеленый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Сепия; Серебристый; Белый; Другое
th: กลุ่มสี: สีดำ; สีน้ำเงิน; สีน้ำเงินอมดำ; สีน้ำตาล; สีทอง; สีเขียว; สีม่วง; สีแดง; ซีเปีย; สีเงิน; สีขาว; อื่นๆ
it: famiglia Colore: Nero; Blu; Blu-nero; Marrone; Oro; Verde; Viola; Rosso; Seppia; Argento; Bianco; Altro
es: Familia de colores: Negro; Azul; Negro azulado; Marrón; Oro; Verde; Morado; Rojo; Sepia; Plata; Blanco; Otro
hu: Színcsalád: Fekete; Kék; Kékesfekete; Barna; Arany; Zöld; Lila; Piros; Szépia; Ezüst; Fehér; Egyéb
hr-HR: Obitelj boja: Crna; Plava; Plavo-crna; Smeđa; Zlatna; Zelena; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Sepija; Srebrna; Bijela; Ostalo
bg-BG: Семейство цвят: Черно; Синьо; Синьо-черно; Кафяво; Златисто; Зелено; Лилаво; Червено; Сепия; Сребристо; Бяло; Друго
pl: Rodzina kolorów: Czarny; Niebieski; Niebieskoczarny; Brązowy; Złoty; Zielony; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Sepia; Srebrny; Biały; Inny
de: Farbfamilie: Schwarz; Blau; Blauschwarz; Braun; Gold; Grün; Lila; Rot; Sepia; Silber; Weiß; Sonstige
zh-TW: 色系: 黑色; 藍色; 藍黑色; 棕色; 金色; 綠色; 紫色; 紅色; 深褐色; 銀色; 白色; 其他
sv: Färgfamilj: Svart; Blå; Blåsvart; Brun; Guld; Grön; Lila; Röd; Sepia; Silver; Vit; Övrigt
nb: Fargefamilie: Svart; Blå; Blåsvart; Brun; Gull; Grønn; Lilla; Rød; Sepia; Sølv; Hvit; Annet
ja: 色系統: 黒; 青; ブルーブラック; 茶色; 金色; 緑; 紫; 赤; セピア; 銀色; 白; その他
fi: Väriperhe: Musta; Sininen; Sinimusta; Ruskea; Kullanvärinen; Vihreä; Violetti; Punainen; Seepia; Hopea; Valkoinen; Muu
ro-RO: Familie de culori: Negru; Albastru; Albastru-negru; Maro; Auriu; Verde; Mov; Roșu; Sepia; Argintiu; Alb; Altele
sl-SI: Barvna družina: Črna; Modra; Modro-črna; Rjava; Zlata; Zelena; Vijoličasta; Rdeča; Sepija; Srebrna; Bela; Drugo
sk-SK: Skupina farieb: Čierna; Modrá; Modročierna; Hnedá; Zlatá; Zelená; Fialová; Červená; Sépia; Strieborná; Biela; Iné
da: Farvefamilie: Sort; Blå; Blåsort; Brun; Guld; Grøn; Lilla; Rød; Sepia; Sølv; Hvid; Andet
zh-CN: 颜色系列: 黑色; 蓝色; 蓝黑色; 棕色; 金色; 绿色; 紫色; 红色; 棕褐色; 银色; 白色; 其他
cs: Barevná kategorie: Černá; Modrá; Modročerná; Hnědá; Zlatá; Zelená; Purpurová; Červená; Sépiová; Stříbrná; Bílá; Ostatní
nl: Kleurfamilie: Zwart; Blauw; Blauwzwart; Bruin; Goud; Groen; Paars; Rood; Sepia; Zilver; Wit; Overige